Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-309 Lessor's and lessee's rights
when goods become fixtures. (a) In this section:

(1) Goods are "fixtures" when they become
so related to particular real estate that an interest in them arises under real
estate law;

(2) A "fixture filing" is the filing, in
the office where a record of a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or
recorded, of a financing statement covering goods that are or are to become
fixtures and conforming to the requirements of section 490:9-502(a) and (b);

(3) A lease is a "purchase money lease"
unless the lessee has possession or use of the goods or the right to possession
or use of the goods before the lease agreement is enforceable;

(4) A mortgage is a "construction mortgage"
to the extent it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an
improvement on land including the acquisition cost of the land, if the recorded
writing so indicates; and

(5) "Encumbrance" includes real estate
mortgages and other liens on real estate and all other rights in real estate
that are not ownership interests.

(b) Under this article a lease may be of goods
that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures, but no lease
exists under this article of ordinary building materials incorporated into an
improvement on land.

(c) This article does not prevent creation of
a lease of fixtures pursuant to real estate law.

(d) The perfected interest of a lessor of
fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner
of the real estate if:

(1) The lease is a purchase money lease, the
conflicting interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods
become fixtures, the interest of the lessor is perfected by a fixture filing
before the goods become fixtures or within ten days thereafter, and the lessee
has an interest of record in the real estate or is in possession of the real
estate; or

(2) The interest of the lessor is perfected by a
fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record,
the lessor's interest has priority over any conflicting interest of a
predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner, and the lessee has an
interest of record in the real estate or is in possession of the real estate.

(e) The interest of a lessor of fixtures,
whether or not perfected, has priority over the conflicting interest of an
encumbrancer or owner of the real estate if:

(1) The fixtures are readily removable factory or
office machines, readily removable equipment that is not primarily used or
leased for use in the operation of the real estate, or readily removable
replacements of domestic appliances that are goods subject to a consumer lease,
and before the goods become fixtures the lease contract is enforceable; or

(2) The conflicting interest is a lien on the real
estate obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the lease contract is
enforceable; or

(3) The encumbrancer or owner has consented in
writing to the lease or has disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures; or

(4) The lessee has a right to remove the goods as
against the encumbrancer or owner. If the lessee's right to remove terminates,
the priority of the interest of the lessor continues for a reasonable time.

(f) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(1) but
otherwise subject to subsections (d) and (e), the interest of a lessor of
fixtures, including the lessor's residual interest, is subordinate to the
conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real estate under a construction
mortgage recorded before the goods become fixtures if the goods become fixtures
before the completion of the construction. To the extent given to refinance a
construction mortgage, the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real
estate under a mortgage has this priority to the same extent as the
encumbrancer of the real estate under the construction mortgage.

(g) In cases not within the preceding
subsections, priority between the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including
the lessor's residual interest, and the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer
or owner of the real estate who is not the lessee is determined by the priority
rules governing conflicting interests in real estate.

(h) If the interest of a lessor of fixtures,
including the lessor's residual interest, has priority over all conflicting
interests of all owners and encumbrancers of the real estate, the lessor or the
lessee may (i) on default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the
lease agreement but subject to the lease agreement and this article, or (ii) if
necessary to enforce other rights and remedies of the lessor or lessee under
this article, remove the goods from the real estate, free and clear of all
conflicting interests of all owners and encumbrancers of the real estate, but
the lessor or lessee must reimburse any encumbrancer or owner of the real
estate who is not the lessee and who has not otherwise agreed for the cost of
repair of any physical injury, but not for any diminution in value of the real
estate caused by the absence of the goods removed or by any necessity of
replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to
remove until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the
performance of this obligation.

(i) Even though the lease agreement does not
create a security interest, the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the
lessor's residual interest, is perfected by filing a financing statement as a
fixture filing for leased goods that are or are to become fixtures in
accordance with the relevant provisions of the article on secured transactions
(article 9). [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 241, §19]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next